Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1608
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1192, § 8.